District of Columbia statutes.
26-1308

Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking

Reports to Superintendent of Banking and Financial Institutions

All companies organized under this chapter, or which shall, under the provisions of this chapter, become entitled to transact the business of a trust company, shall report to the Superintendent of Banking and Financial Institutions [Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking] pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 7 of this title.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1304, ch. 854, § 720
Nov. 23, 1985, D.C. Law 6-63,§ 106(a)(7)
as added Apr. 11, 1986, D.C. Law 6-107, § 2(k), 33 DCR 1168
1981 Ed., § 26-408.
1973 Ed., § 26-308.